Utah statutes.
62A-11-602.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Child support" is as defined in Section 62A-11-401.

(2)  "Delinquent on a child support obligation" means that a person:

(a) (i)  made no payment for 60 days on a current child support obligation as set forth in an administrative or court order;

(ii)  after the 60-day period described in Subsection (2)(a)(i), failed to make a good faith effort under the circumstances to make payment on the child support obligation in accordance with the order; and

(iii)  has not obtained a judicial order staying enforcement of the person's child support obligation, or the amount in arrears; or

(b) (i)  made no payment for 60 days on an arrearage obligation of child support as set forth in:

(A)  a payment schedule;

(B)  a written agreement with the office; or

(C)  an administrative or judicial order;

(ii)  after the 60-day period described in Subsection (2)(b)(i), failed to make a good faith effort under the circumstances to make payment on the child support obligation in accordance with the payment schedule, agreement, or order; and

(iii)  has not obtained a judicial order staying enforcement of the person's child support obligation, or the amount in arrears.

(3)  "Driver license" means a license, as defined in Section 53-3-102.

(4)  "Driver License Division" means the Driver License Division of the Department of Public Safety created in Section 53-3-103.

(5)  "Office" means the Office of Recovery Services created in Section 62A-11-102.

